Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2089.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5579YH (6) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2089 Section 1. Section 99F.6, subsection 4, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (2) (a) A qualified sponsoring organization licensed to 3 operate gambling games under this chapter shall distribute 4 the receipts of all gambling games, less reasonable expenses, 5 charges, taxes, fees, and deductions allowed under this 6 chapter , as winnings to players or participants or shall 7 distribute the receipts for educational, civic, public, 8 charitable, patriotic, or religious uses as defined in section 9 99B.1 . A qualified sponsoring organization shall provide that 10 any organization exempt from federal income taxes under section 11 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code, as defined in section 12 422.3 , shall be eligible for a distribution of adjusted gross 13 receipts for educational, civic, public, charitable, patriotic, 14 or religious uses as required by this subparagraph. However, a 15 licensee to conduct gambling games under this chapter shall, 16 unless an operating agreement for an excursion gambling boat 17 otherwise provides, distribute at least three percent of the 18 adjusted gross receipts and, if applicable, three-quarters of 19 one percent of sports wagering net receipts for each license 20 year for educational, civic, public, charitable, patriotic, 21 or religious uses as defined in section 99B.1 , as provided in 22 subparagraph division (b) . However, if a licensee who is also 23 licensed to conduct pari-mutuel wagering at a horse racetrack 24 has unpaid debt from the pari-mutuel racetrack operations, 25 the first receipts of the gambling games operated within the 26 racetrack enclosure less reasonable operating expenses, taxes, 27 and fees allowed under this chapter shall be first used to pay 28 the annual indebtedness. 29 (b) (i) A licensee making a required distribution for 30 educational, civic, public, charitable, patriotic, or religious 31 uses pursuant to subparagraph division (a) shall distribute at 32 least seventy-five percent of the moneys on a pro rata basis, 33 as provided in subparagraph subdivision (ii), for use in each 34 Iowa county whose residents contributed to the gambling games 35 -1- LSB 5579YH (6) 91 ss/ns 1/ 4 H.F. 2089 or sports wagering receipts of the licensee. 1 (ii) The licensee shall collect and maintain records 2 to determine the county of residence of all players or 3 participants who contributed to the gambling games or sports 4 wagering receipts of the licensee and the amount of receipts 5 attributable to each player or participant. The distribution 6 to be made for use in each Iowa county shall be based on the 7 gross receipts generated by players or participants from 8 a given Iowa county in comparison to the total such gross 9 receipts generated by players or participants from all Iowa 10 counties. Receipts generated by persons who are not residents 11 of Iowa or whose county of residence cannot be verified shall 12 be distributed proportionally in each Iowa county based on the 13 distribution calculated for gross receipts generated by players 14 or participants from Iowa counties. 15 (iii) This subparagraph division (b) does not restrict the 16 distribution of gambling games or sports wagering receipts of 17 a licensee in excess of seventy-five percent of the moneys 18 distributed. Such receipts shall be distributed as otherwise 19 authorized or required by law. 20 (iv) A licensee shall file an annual report with the 21 commission that includes all of the following, which the 22 commission shall post publicly on the commissionâs internet 23 site: 24 (A) The total amount of the licenseeâs gambling games and 25 sports wagering receipts generated by residents of each Iowa 26 county. 27 (B) The total amount of the licenseeâs gambling games 28 and sports wagering receipts generated by persons who are 29 not residents of Iowa or whose county of residence cannot be 30 verified. 31 (C) The total amount of moneys distributed by the licensee 32 under this subparagraph (2). 33 (D) The amount of moneys distributed to each Iowa county by 34 the licensee under this subparagraph (2). 35 -2- LSB 5579YH (6) 91 ss/ns 2/ 4 H.F. 2089 (v) (A) A licensee who fails to comply with this 1 subparagraph division (b) shall be subject to a civil 2 penalty not to exceed five percent of the total amount of 3 moneys required to be distributed by the licensee under this 4 subparagraph (2), to be imposed and collected by the commission 5 and deposited in the general fund of the state. 6 (B) The commission may order a licensee that fails to comply 7 with this subparagraph division (b) to redistribute the moneys 8 as required by law. 9 (C) A licensee that willfully or repeatedly fails to 10 comply with this subparagraph division (b) shall be subject 11 to additional discipline by the commission, which may include 12 suspension of the licenseeâs license. 13 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to gambling 14 games and sports wagering receipts collected in a fiscal year 15 beginning on or after the effective date of this Act. 16